Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201118-1738.01
Handicapped
or disabled persons; motor vehicle used for transportation; parking permits;
issuance; procedure; renewal.

(1) This section applies until the implementation date designated
by the Director of Motor Vehicles under section 60-3,113.01.

(2) The clerk of any city
of the primary class, first class, or second class or village shall, or the
county clerk or designated county official pursuant to section 23-186 or the
Department of Motor Vehicles may, take an application from any person for
a handicapped or disabled parking permit that is issued for a specific motor vehicle
and entitles the holder thereof or a person driving the motor
vehicle for the purpose of transporting handicapped or disabled persons or
temporarily handicapped or disabled persons to park in those spaces or access
aisles provided for by sections 18-1736 to 18-1741 if the motor vehicle is
used primarily for the transportation of handicapped or disabled persons or
temporarily handicapped or disabled persons. Such permit shall be used only when the motor
vehicle for which it was issued is being used for the transportation of a
handicapped or disabled person or temporarily handicapped or disabled person
and such person will enter or exit the motor vehicle while it is parked in
such designated spaces or access aisles.

(3) A person applying for
a handicapped or disabled parking permit
or for the renewal of a permit pursuant to this section shall apply for a
permit for each motor vehicle used for the transportation of handicapped or
disabled persons or temporarily handicapped or disabled persons, shall complete
such forms as are provided to the clerk or designated county official by the
Department of Motor Vehicles, and shall demonstrate to the clerk or designated
county official or the department that each such motor vehicle is used primarily
for the transportation of handicapped or disabled persons or temporarily handicapped
or disabled persons. The application form shall contain information listing
the legal uses of the permit and that the permit is not transferable, is to
be used by the party to whom issued or for the motor vehicle for which it
is issued, is not to be altered or reproduced, and is to be used only when
a handicapped or disabled person or a temporarily handicapped or disabled
person will enter or exit the motor vehicle while it is parked in a designated
parking space or access aisle. The application form shall provide space for
the applicant to sign a statement that he or she is aware of his or her rights,
duties, and responsibilities with regard to the use and possession of a permit
and the penalties provided by law for handicapped parking infractions. The
application form shall also indicate that those convicted of handicapped parking
infractions shall be subject to suspension of the permit for six months. A
copy of the completed application form shall be given to each applicant. No
more than one such permit shall be issued for each motor vehicle. An
application for the renewal of a permit under this section may be filed within one hundred eighty days prior to the expiration
of the permit. The existing permit shall be invalid upon receipt of the new
permit. Following the receipt of the application and its processing, the Department
of Motor Vehicles shall deliver each individual renewed permit to the applicant, except that renewed permits
shall not be issued sooner than ten days prior to the date of expiration.

(4) The department, upon receipt
from the clerk or designated county official of a completed application form, shall
verify that the applicant qualifies for a handicapped
or disabled parking permit under this section and, if so, shall deliver the permit to the
applicant. The clerk or designated county official shall
submit to the department the name, address, and license number of all persons
applying for a permit pursuant to this section.

Laws 1980, LB 717, § 5;

Laws 1987, LB 598, § 4;

Laws 1992, LB 928, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 112, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 632, § 11;

Laws 1995, LB 593, § 4;

Laws 1996, LB 1211, § 4;

Laws 2001, LB 809, § 4;

Laws 2011, LB163, § 4.
August 27, 2011
Department of Motor Vehicles, maintain registry of permitholders, see section 60-3,113.